District of Columbia statutes.
8-638.01

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including provisions concerning site assessment, financial assurance, feasibility studies, response actions, enforcement, cleanup standards, natural resources, public participation, and other provisions relevant to this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor shall have the authority to enter into cooperative agreements, cost-sharing and other agreements for which states are eligible under the Federal Act and other statutes in order to further the purposes of this chapter.

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 801, 48 DCR 3804
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(n), 58 DCR 996
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(n) of Brownfield Revitalization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-667, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 95).
D.C. Law 18-369 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) The Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.”